Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.130

Written contract required—Penalty.

No goods or real estate shall be sold at auction until the auctioneer or auction company has entered into a written contract or agreement with the owner or consignor in duplicate which contains the terms and conditions upon which the licensee receives or accepts the property for sale at auction.

A person who violates this section shall be subject to an administrative fine in a sum not exceeding five hundred dollars for each violation.

[ 1986 c 324 s 9; 1982 c 205 s 11.]